Hawaii statutes.
§453-8.7 Reporting requirements. (a)
Every physician or osteopathic physician licensed pursuant to this chapter who
does not possess professional liability insurance shall report any settlement
or arbitration award of a claim or action for damages for death or personal
injury caused by negligence, error, or omission in practice, or the
unauthorized rendering of professional services. The report shall be submitted
to the department of commerce and consumer affairs within thirty days after any
written settlement agreement has been reduced to writing and signed by all the
parties thereto or thirty days after service of the arbitration award on the
parties.

(b) Failure of a physician or osteopathic
physician to comply with the provisions of this section is an offense
punishable by a fine of not less than $100 for the first offense, $250 to $500
for the second offense, and $500 to $1,000 for subsequent offenses.

(c) The clerks of the respective courts of
this State shall report to the department any judgment or other determination
of the court, which adjudges or finds that a physician or osteopathic physician
is liable criminally or civilly for any death or personal injury caused by the
physician's or osteopathic physician's professional negligence, error, or
omission in the practice of the physician's or osteopathic physician's
profession, or rendering of unauthorized professional services. The report
shall be submitted to the department within ten days after the judgment is
entered by the court.

(d) The department shall prescribe forms for
the submission of reports required by this section. [L 1982, c 227, pt of §1;
am L 1983, c 92, §1(8); am L 1984, c 168, §12; am L 2008, c 5, §14]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next